Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 2. VOTER QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

CHAPTER 15. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION OF REGISTRATION

SUBCHAPTER A. FORM AND CONTENTS OF REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE; REPLACEMENT OF CERTIFICATE

Sec. 15.001. REQUIRED CONTENTS. (a) Each voter registration certificate issued must contain:

(1) the voter's name in the form indicated by the voter, subject to applicable requirements prescribed by Section 13.002 and by rule of the secretary of state;

(2) the voter's residence address or, if the residence has no address, the address at which the voter receives mail and a concise description of the location of the voter's residence;

(3) the year of the voter's birth;

(4) the number of the county election precinct in which the voter resides;

(5) the voter's effective date of registration if an initial certificate;

(6) the voter's registration number;

(7) an indication of the period for which the certificate is issued;

(8) a statement explaining the circumstances under which the voter will receive a new certificate;

(9) a space for stamping the voter's political party affiliation;

(10) a statement that voting with the certificate by a person other than the person in whose name the certificate is issued is a felony;

(11) a space for the voter's signature;

(12) a statement that the voter must sign the certificate personally, if able to sign, immediately on receipt;

(13) a space for the voter to correct the information on the certificate followed by a signature line;

(14) the statement: "If any information on this certificate changes or is incorrect, correct the information in the space provided, sign below, and return this certificate to the voter registrar.";

(15) the registrar's mailing address and telephone number; and

(16) the jurisdictional or distinguishing number for the following territorial units in which the voter resides, as determined by the voter registrar:

(A) congressional district;

(B) state senatorial district;

(C) state representative district;

(D) commissioners precinct;

(E) justice precinct;

(F) city election precinct; and

(G) school district election precinct.

(b) A certificate may not contain:

(1) the voter's telephone number;

(2) the voter's social security number; or

(3) except as provided by Section 15.002, any other information not specified by Subsection (a).

(c) A certificate issued to a voter who meets the certification requirements of Section 13.002(i) must contain an indication that the voter is exempt from the requirement to present identification other than the registration certificate before being accepted for voting.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 436, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 390, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 532 (S.B. 932), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.002. OPTIONAL CONTENTS. (a) A voter registration certificate may contain an explanation of the voter's rights or duties under this code, including:

(1) the procedure by which the voter will receive a renewal certificate;

(2) the necessity of notifying the registrar if the voter changes residence;

(3) the necessity of applying for a new registration if the voter changes residence to another county;

(4) the period during which the voter may vote a limited ballot after changing residence to another county;

(5) the procedure for voting without a certificate; and

(6) the procedure for obtaining a replacement for a lost or destroyed certificate.

(b) An explanation authorized by Subsection (a) may appear on a separate sheet accompanying the certificate when it is delivered.

(c) In addition to the territorial units required to be listed on a voter registration certificate under Section 15.001(a)(16), a certificate may contain up to seven jurisdictional or distinguishing numbers for any other territorial units in which the voter resides.

(d) A voter registration certificate may contain the voter's sex.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 532 (S.B. 932), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2007.

Sec. 15.003. SIGNING CERTIFICATE BY VOTER. (a) On receipt of a voter registration certificate issued under this title, the person to whom the certificate is issued must personally sign it in the appropriate space.

(b) This section does not apply to a person who cannot sign the certificate because of a physical disability or illiteracy.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 15.004. REPLACEMENT CERTIFICATE. (a) A voter whose registration certificate is lost or destroyed may obtain a replacement certificate by:

(1) delivering a written or electronic notice of the loss or destruction to the registrar; or

(2) telephoning the registrar to request a replacement.

(b) A replacement certificate requested electronically under Subsection (a)(1) or by telephone under Subsection (a)(2) may be sent only to the mailing address on the voter's registration records.

(c) Subject to Subsection (b), not later than the 30th day after the date the registrar receives the notice or request, the registrar shall deliver to the voter a replacement certificate containing:

(1) the registration number and other information on the lost or destroyed certificate; and

(2) a notation that the certificate is a replacement.

(d) The registrar shall retain a written or electronic notice submitted under Subsection (a)(1) on file with the voter's registration application. If the voter requests a replacement registration certificate by telephone under Subsection (a)(2), the registrar shall make a written record of the request and keep the record on file with the voter's registration application.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 349 (H.B. 2263), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 15.005. NOTICE OF IDENTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) The voter registrar of each county shall provide notice of the identification requirements for voting prescribed by Chapter 63 and a detailed description of those requirements with each voter registration certificate issued under Section 13.142 or renewal registration certificate issued under Section 14.001.

(b) The secretary of state shall prescribe the wording of the notice to be included on the certificate under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. CORRECTION OF REGISTRATION INFORMATION

Sec. 15.021. NOTICE OF CHANGE IN REGISTRATION INFORMATION BY VOTER. (a) If a voter discovers incorrect information on the voter's registration certificate or if any of the information becomes incorrect because of a change in circumstances, the voter shall promptly submit to the registrar a written, signed notice of the incorrect information and the corresponding correction.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the voter shall use the registration certificate or a registration application form as the notice, indicating the correct information in the appropriate space on the certificate or application form unless the voter does not have possession of the certificate or an application form at the time of giving the notice.

(c) The registrar shall retain the notice on file with the voter's registration application. If the correction is a change of the voter's name, the registrar shall file the application under the new name.

(d) A voter may correct information under this section by digital transmission of the information under a program administered by the secretary of state and the Department of Information Resources.

(d-1) If the notice indicates that a voter no longer resides in the county in which the voter is registered, the registrar shall forward the notice and the voter's application for registration to the registrar of the county in which the voter resides. The registrars shall coordinate to ensure that the voter's existing registration is canceled immediately after the voter is registered in the county in which the voter resides in accordance with Subsection (d-2).

(d-2) A registrar who receives a voter's notice and application from another registrar under Subsection (d-1) shall treat it as an original application for registration under Section 13.002, and shall register the voter if the voter resides in the county and is otherwise eligible under Section 13.001.

(e) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to:

(1) approve technologies for submitting changes of registration information by digital transmission under this section; and

(2) prescribe additional procedures as necessary to implement a system for the digital transmission of changes in registration information.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 454, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1178, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1105 (H.B. 2280), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.03, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 15.0215. OMISSION OF ADDRESS FOR FEDERAL OR STATE JUDGE, FEDERAL OFFICIAL, AND FAMILY MEMBER. (a) In this section, "family member" has the meaning assigned by Section 31.006, Finance Code.

(b) On receiving notice from the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System of the person's qualification for office as a federal judge, including a federal bankruptcy judge, a marshal of the United States Marshals Service, a United States attorney, or a state judge and of the names of the judge's or federal official's family members, if applicable, the registrar of the county in which the judge resides shall:

(1) omit from the registration list the residence address of the judge or official and any family members of the judge or official; and

(2) prepare a memorandum of the notice, indicating the substance and date of the notification, and retain the memorandum on file with the application.

(c) A registered district voter who wishes to verify that an elected judge whose personal identifying information is confidential under Section 552.1175, Government Code, resides in the district may request in writing that the registrar certify the judge lives in the district. The registrar shall exercise due diligence in determining the residence of the judge and respond to the voter in writing not later than the 10th business day after the date the request is received on whether the judge resides in the district. The registrar may not release the address of the judge. The registrar is not required to certify the residence of the same judge more than once in a calendar year, but must provide copies of the certification to subsequent requestors.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (H.B. 41), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 465 (S.B. 281), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2910), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2910), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 1134), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.022. CORRECTION OF REGISTRATION RECORDS. (a) The registrar shall make the appropriate corrections in the registration records, including, if necessary, deleting a voter's name from the suspense list:

(1) after receipt of a notice of a change in registration information under Section 15.021;

(2) after receipt of a voter's reply to a notice of investigation given under Section 16.033;

(3) after receipt of any affidavits executed under Section 63.006, following an election;

(4) after receipt of a voter's statement of residence executed under Section 63.0011;

(5) before the effective date of the abolishment of a county election precinct or a change in its boundary;

(6) after receipt of United States Postal Service information indicating an address reclassification;

(7) after receipt of a voter's response under Section 15.053;

(8) after receipt of a registration application or change of address under Chapter 20; or

(9) after notification of a data entry error of which the voter registrar is made aware under Section 63.0051.

(b) At least monthly, the registrar shall request from the United States Postal Service any available information indicating address reclassifications affecting the registered voters of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 12(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 5.002, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.023. TIME FOR CERTAIN DELETIONS FROM SUSPENSE LIST. If the name of a voter on the list of registered voters appears on the suspense list, the voter's name shall be deleted from the list on the date the voter provides:

(1) a completed application to register to vote in accordance with Section 13.002; or

(2) a correction of information under Section 15.021(d).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.024. CORRECTED REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), after correcting the registration records with respect to a voter, if necessary, the registrar shall issue the voter a registration certificate containing the appropriate corrections and deliver it to the voter not later than the 30th day after the date the registrar receives notice of a correction.

(b) A corrected certificate is not required for a correction to the registration records under Section 15.022(a)(5).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 844 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 15.025. EFFECTIVE DATE OF CERTAIN CHANGES IN REGISTRATION INFORMATION. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (d), the registration of a voter described by this subsection whose information is changed on the registration records becomes effective as to the change on the 30th day after:

(1) the date the voter submits to the registrar a notice of a change in registration information under Section 15.021 or a response under Section 15.053, indicating the change; or

(2) the date the voter submits a statement of residence to an election officer under Section 63.0011 or a registration application or change of address to an agency employee under Chapter 20, indicating the change.

(b) A change in registration information covered by this section is effective for purposes of early voting if it will be effective on election day.

(c) For purposes of determining the effective date of a change in registration information covered by this section, a document submitted by mail is considered to be submitted to the registrar on the date it is placed with postage prepaid and properly addressed in the United States mail. The date indicated by the post office cancellation mark is considered to be the date the document was placed in the mail unless proven otherwise.

(d) If the 30th day before the date of an election is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state or national holiday, the document is considered to be timely if it is submitted to the registrar on or before the next regular business day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 15.027. NOTICE TO VOTER OF PRECINCT BOUNDARY CHANGE. (a) Before the effective date of the abolishment of a county election precinct or a change in its boundary, the registrar shall deliver written notice of that action to each affected registered voter.

(b) If the voter is not issued a corrected registration certificate, the notice shall inform the voter of the new precinct number and direct the voter to correct the precinct number on the voter's registration certificate and to retain the certificate for continued use.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 15.028. NOTICE OF UNLAWFUL VOTING OR REGISTRATION. If the registrar determines that a person who is not eligible to vote registered to vote or voted in an election, the registrar shall, within 72 hours not including weekends after making the determination, execute and deliver to the attorney general, the secretary of state, and the county or district attorney having jurisdiction in the territory covered by the election an affidavit stating the relevant facts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 2.04, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. CONFIRMATION OF RESIDENCE

Sec. 15.051. CONFIRMATION NOTICE. (a) If the registrar has reason to believe that a voter's current residence is different from that indicated on the registration records, or that the voter's residence address is a commercial post office box or similar location that does not correspond to a residence, the registrar shall deliver to the voter a written confirmation notice requesting confirmation of the voter's current residence.

(b) The registrar shall include an official confirmation notice response form with each confirmation notice delivered to a voter.

(c) The confirmation notice shall be delivered by forwardable mail to the voter's last known address.

(d) The registrar shall maintain with the voter's record an indication that a confirmation notice was sent to the voter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (S.B. 1111), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.052. OFFICIAL CONFIRMATION NOTICE AND CONFIRMATION NOTICE RESPONSE FORMS. (a) The officially prescribed form for a confirmation notice must include:

(1) a statement that, if the voter fails to submit to the registrar a written, signed response confirming the voter's current residence on or before the 30th day after the date the confirmation notice is mailed:

(A) the voter is subject to submission of a statement of residence before the voter may be accepted for voting in an election held after that deadline; or

(B) for a notice delivered under Section 14.023, the voter will remain subject to submission of a statement of residence before the voter may be accepted for voting in an election;

(2) a warning that the voter's registration is subject to cancellation if the voter fails to confirm the voter's current residence either by notifying the registrar in writing or voting on a statement of residence before November 30 following the second general election for state and county officers that occurs after the date the confirmation notice is mailed; and

(3) a statement that the voter must include all of the required information on the official confirmation notice response form.

(b) The official confirmation notice response form must:

(1) provide spaces for the voter to include all of the information that a person must include in an application to register to vote under Section 13.002;

(2) describe the requirements of Section 15.054, provide a space for the voter to indicate if the voter is exempt from those requirements, and provide a space to indicate the reason for an exemption, if any;

(3) provide the definition of residence under Section 1.015; and

(4) be postage prepaid and preaddressed for delivery to the registrar.

(c) The registrar may prescribe a different design from that prescribed by the secretary of state for an official form, if approved by the secretary.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3069), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (S.B. 1111), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.053. RESPONSE TO CONFIRMATION NOTICE. (a) The voter shall submit to the registrar a written, signed response to the notice that confirms the voter's current residence. The response must contain:

(1) all of the information that a person must include in an application to register to vote under Section 13.002;

(2) a sworn affirmation of the voter's current residence as defined by Section 1.015; and

(3) if the voter's residence address is a commercial post office box or similar location that does not correspond to a residence, evidence of the voter's residence address as required by Section 15.054 or an indication that the voter is exempt from those requirements.

(b) The voter shall use an official confirmation notice response form for the response unless the voter does not have possession of the official form at the time of making the response.

(c) The registrar shall act on the response in accordance with Section 13.072 and retain the response on file with the voter's registration application.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3069), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (S.B. 1111), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.054. DOCUMENTATION OF RESIDENCE FOR PURPOSES OF CONFIRMATION NOTICE RESPONSE. (a) For purposes of Section 15.053, a voter's residence may be documented by providing a photocopy of the first document, beginning with Subdivision (1) and continuing through Subdivision (6), in the following list that corresponds to the voter's residence under Section 1.015:

(1) a driver's license issued to the voter by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or, if the voter has notified the department of a change of address under Section 521.054, Transportation Code, an affidavit from the voter stating the new address contained in the notification;

(2) a personal identification card issued to the voter by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or, if the voter has notified the department of a change of address under Section 521.054, Transportation Code, an affidavit from the voter stating the new address contained in the notification;

(3) a license to carry a concealed handgun issued to the voter by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or, if the voter has notified the department of a change of address under Section 411.181, Government Code, an affidavit from the voter stating the new address contained in the notification;

(4) an appraisal district document showing the address the voter claims as a homestead in this state;

(5) a utility bill addressed to the voter's residence address; or

(6) an official tax document or Texas Department of Motor Vehicles document showing the registration address of a vehicle the voter owns.

(b) A voter whose residence in this state has no address may document residence under this section by executing an affidavit stating that the voter's residence in this state has no address, providing a concise description of the location of the voter's residence, and delivering the affidavit to the registrar with the voter's response to the confirmation notice.

(c) The address described by Subsection (a)(4) may not be a commercial post office box or similar location that does not correspond to a residence.

(d) This section does not apply to:

(1) a voter who is a member of the armed forces of the United States or the spouse or a dependent of a member;

(2) a voter enrolled as a full-time student who lives on campus at an institution of higher education;

(3) a voter whose address is confidential under Subchapter C, Chapter 56, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(4) a federal judge, state judge, or spouse of a federal or state judge whose driver's license includes the street address of a courthouse under Section 521.121, Transportation Code; or

(5) a peace officer whose driver's license omits the officer's actual residence address under Section 521.1211, Transportation Code.

(e) Subsection (a)(1) does not apply to a voter who holds a commercial driver's license under Subchapter C, Chapter 522, Transportation Code.

(f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a voter enrolled as a full-time student who lives on campus at an institution of higher education may use the address of a post office box located on the campus of the institution or in a dormitory owned or operated by the institution to confirm the voter's residence.

(g) The secretary of state shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (S.B. 1111), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. SUSPENSE LIST

Sec. 15.081. SUSPENSE LIST. (a) The registrar shall maintain a suspense list containing the name of each voter:

(1) who fails to submit a response to the registrar in accordance with Section 15.053;

(2) whose renewal certificate is returned to the registrar in accordance with Subchapter B, Chapter 14; or

(3) who appears on the list of nonresidents of the county provided to the registrar under Section 62.114, Government Code.

(b) The list shall be arranged alphabetically by voter name and for each voter must contain the voter's name, residence address, date of birth, registration number, and date the name is entered on the list. The names shall be grouped according to county election precincts.

(c) The secretary of state may prescribe an alternative form or procedure for maintaining the list.

(d) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), the suspense list may not contain the residence address of a voter whose residence address is confidential under Section 13.004.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 559 (H.B. 1271), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (H.B. 41), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 465 (S.B. 281), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2910), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 15.082. AVAILABILITY OF REGISTRAR'S LIST. (a) The registrar shall furnish a copy of the suspense list to any person requesting it or shall furnish that portion of the list requested.

(b) The list shall be provided in accordance with Chapter 552, Government Code.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 99(1), eff. September 1, 2021.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 99(1), eff. September 1, 2021.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 99(1), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 15.083. DELIVERY OF LIST TO SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The secretary of state may require the registrar to deliver a copy of the suspense list to the secretary in the form prescribed by the secretary.

(b) The registrar shall deliver the list within the period prescribed by the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 15.084. AVAILABILITY OF SECRETARY OF STATE'S LIST. (a) The secretary of state shall furnish a copy of a suspense list delivered under Section 15.083 to any person requesting it or shall furnish that portion of the list requested.

(b) The fee for each list or portion of a list furnished under this section may not exceed the actual expense incurred in reproducing the list or portion for the person requesting it and shall be uniform for each type of copy furnished.

(c) The copy shall be furnished in the form in which the list is stored or, if practicable, in any other form requested.

(d) The secretary of state shall use fees collected under this section to defray expenses incurred in the preparation of the copy.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 15.085. UNLAWFUL USE OF INFORMATION ON SUSPENSE LISTS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person uses information in connection with advertising or promoting commercial products or services that the person knows was obtained under Section 15.082 or 15.084.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 15.086. INTERNET ACCESS TO SUSPENSE INFORMATION. Any Internet website maintained by the secretary of state that permits a person to determine the person's voter registration status shall, to the extent practicable, indicate if the person is or may be on the suspense list.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 356 (H.B. 2465), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER E. VOTING ON STATEMENT OF RESIDENCE

Sec. 15.111. NOTATION ON LIST OF REGISTERED VOTERS. (a) The registrar shall enter the notation "S", or a similar notation approved by the secretary of state, on the list of registered voters beside each voter's name that also appears on the suspense list.

(b) The registrar shall delete the notation from the list if the voter's name is deleted from the suspense list.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 15.112. AUTHORIZATION TO VOTE ON STATEMENT. In an election held on or after the date the voter's name is entered on the suspense list and before November 30 following the second general election for state and county officers that occurs after the beginning of the period, a voter whose name appears on a precinct list of registered voters with the notation "S", or a similar notation, may vote in the election precinct in which the list is used if the voter satisfies the residence requirements prescribed by Section 63.0011 and submits a statement of residence in accordance with that section.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.